Nebraska, session 109, LB1236.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. (1) The Clerk of the Legislature is authorized to distribute
the session laws, the journal of the Legislature, and the statutes of the
state. The session laws, journal, and statutes may be published in print or
electronic format or in both formats.
(2) The session laws and journal shall be compiled and published by the
Clerk of the Legislature after each regular session of the Legislature. The
session laws shall contain all the laws passed by the preceding session as well
as those passed during any special session since the last regular session. The
session laws shall also contain a certified copy of the Constitution of
Nebraska as required by section 49-1701. The clerk shall distribute one copy of
the session laws and the journal to each member of the Legislature and shall
distribute a second copy to any member of the Legislature upon such member's
request.
(3) The Revisor of Statutes shall cause the statutes to be printed
pursuant to section 49-704 and the policy described in subsection (4) of this
section. The printer shall deliver all completed copies to the Clerk of the
Legislature for distribution.
(4) The Clerk of the Legislature shall provide copies of the session laws,
journal, and statutes for distribution to judges, county officers and offices,
state officers and agencies, libraries, and other persons pursuant to a policy
adopted by the Executive Board of the Legislative Council. The clerk shall
distribute such copies by the most expeditious and economic means as the clerk
determines pursuant to the policy adopted by the executive board. Any person
may send a request to the clerk for printed copies of the session laws,
journal, or statutes and shall pay the cost of production and delivery of such
copies as such costs are determined by the clerk based on prices prescribed by
the executive board pursuant to the policy. The clerk may sell or otherwise
dispose of copies determined to be surplus or superseded pursuant to the
policy.
Sec. 2. Section 49-501, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
49-501 The Secretary of State is hereby authorized to distribute the laws
and journals of the state.
This section terminates on January 1, 2027.
Sec. 3. Section 49-501.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
49-501.01 The session laws and journal of the Legislature shall be
compiled and published by the Clerk of the Legislature after each regular
session of the Legislature. The session laws and journal may be published in
print or electronic format or in both formats. The session laws shall contain
all the laws passed by the preceding session as well as those passed during any
special session since the last regular session. The session laws shall also
contain a certified copy of the Constitution of Nebraska as required by section
49-1701. The clerk shall distribute one copy of the session laws and journal to
each person who was a member of the Legislature by which the laws were enacted
and shall distribute a second copy to any such person upon such person's his or
her request. The clerk shall provide the session laws and journals to the
Secretary of State for distribution pursuant to sections 49-501 to 49-509.01.
This section terminates on January 1, 2027.
Sec. 4. Section 49-502, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
49-502 The county clerk shall distribute one copy of the session laws to
the clerk of the district court for the use of the district court in all
counties of the state except Lancaster and Douglas Counties, and in those
-1-

LB1236 LB1236
2026 2026
counties one copy for each district judge in the county, to the judge of the
county court, to the county attorney, and to the county law library. The county
clerk He or she shall also reserve one copy each of the laws and journals for
the county clerk's own use himself or herself and give one copy to each clerk
magistrate in the county.
This section terminates on January 1, 2027.
Sec. 5. Section 49-503, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
49-503 The county clerk of each county shall make a requisition to upon
the Secretary of State for copies of the session laws and the journal of the
Legislature for the use of such the county of which he or she is clerk. The
county clerk shall make the requisition for session laws based on the
classification of the county by population as provided in section 23-1114.01. A
Class 1 county may request a maximum of three sets, a Class 2 county may
request a maximum of five sets, a Class 3 county may request a maximum of seven
sets, a Class 4 county may request a maximum of ten sets, a Class 5 county may
request a maximum of twelve sets, a Class 6 county may request a maximum of
twenty sets, and a Class 7 county may request a maximum of twenty-five sets.
The county clerk shall make a requisition for less than the maximum amount
authorized if the county clerk he or she finds that a lesser amount is
sufficient for the needs of the county. The county clerk shall make a
requisition for one copy of the journal of the Legislature. The Secretary of
State shall forward the session laws and journal to each county by the most
expeditious and economic means and in print or electronic format as he or she
determines, upon recommendation by the Clerk of the Legislature and approval of
the Executive Board of the Legislative Council.
This section terminates on January 1, 2027.
Sec. 6. Section 49-504, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
49-504 Each county officer shall deliver to such officer's his successor
in office all laws and journals which shall have come into such officer's his
possession under the provisions of sections 49-502 and 49-503 as soon after
such officer's his successor shall have qualified as such successor or as the
county clerk may require.
This section terminates on January 1, 2027.
Sec. 7. Section 49-505, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
49-505 After the above distribution under sections 49-502 to 49-504, the
copies of laws and journals remaining in the hands of the county clerk may,
upon their application, be distributed to the request of the librarians of any
public libraries within the county for whose support an annual tax is levied,
be distributed to such librarians.
This section terminates on January 1, 2027.
Sec. 8. Section 49-506, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is amended to
read:
49-506 After the Secretary of State has made the distribution provided by
section 49-503, he or she shall deliver additional copies of the session laws
and the journal of the Legislature pursuant to this section in print or
electronic format as he or she determines, upon recommendation by the Clerk of
the Legislature and approval of the Executive Board of the Legislative Council.
One copy of the session laws shall be delivered to the Lieutenant
Governor, the State Treasurer, the Auditor of Public Accounts, the Reporter of
Decisions, the State Court Administrator, the State Fire Marshal, the
Department of Administrative Services, the Department of Agriculture, the
Department of Banking and Finance, the State Department of Education, the
Department of Insurance, the Department of Labor, the Department of Motor
Vehicles, the Department of Revenue, the Department of Transportation, the
Department of Veterans' Affairs, the Department of Water, Energy, and
Environment, the Military Department, the Nebraska State Patrol, the Nebraska
Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice, each of the Nebraska state
colleges, the Game and Parks Commission, the Nebraska Library Commission, the
Nebraska Liquor Control Commission, the Nebraska Accountability and Disclosure
Commission, the Public Service Commission, the State Real Estate Commission,
the Nebraska State Historical Society, the Public Employees Retirement Board,
the Risk Manager, the Legislative Fiscal Analyst, the Public Counsel, the
materiel division of the Department of Administrative Services, the State
Records Administrator, the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services, the Tax Equalization and Review Commission, the inmate library at all
state penal and correctional institutions, the Commission on Public Advocacy,
and the Library of Congress; two copies to the Governor, the Secretary of
State, the Commission of Industrial Relations, and the Coordinating Commission
for Postsecondary Education, one of which shall be for use by the community
colleges; three copies to the Department of Health and Human Services; four
copies to the Nebraska Publications Clearinghouse; five copies to the Attorney
General; nine copies to the Revisor of Statutes; sixteen copies to the Supreme
Court and the Legislative Council; and thirty-five copies to the University of
Nebraska College of Law.
One copy of the journal of the Legislature shall be delivered to the
Governor, the Lieutenant Governor, the State Treasurer, the Auditor of Public
Accounts, the Reporter of Decisions, the State Court Administrator, the
Nebraska State Historical Society, the Legislative Fiscal Analyst, the Tax
Equalization and Review Commission, the Commission on Public Advocacy, and the
Library of Congress; two copies to the Secretary of State and the Commission of
-2-

LB1236 LB1236
2026 2026
Industrial Relations; four copies to the Nebraska Publications Clearinghouse;
five copies to the Attorney General and the Revisor of Statutes; eight copies
to the Clerk of the Legislature; thirteen copies to the Supreme Court and the
Legislative Council; and thirty-five copies to the University of Nebraska
College of Law. The remaining copies shall be delivered to the State Librarian
who shall use the same, so far as required for exchange purposes, in building
up the State Library and in the manner specified in sections 49-507 to 49-509.
This section terminates on January 1, 2027.
Sec. 9. Section 49-507, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
49-507 The State Librarian or the State Librarian's his or her designee
shall issue one copy each of the session laws and journals to the United States
District Attorney, the United States Marshal, the register and receiver of the
United States land offices in the state, and each United States Commissioner
residing in the state. The State Librarian shall determine whether the copies
issued are in print or a reasonably available electronic format, upon
recommendation by the Clerk of the Legislature and approval of the Executive
Board of the Legislative Council.
This section terminates on January 1, 2027.
Sec. 10. Section 49-508, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
49-508 The new members of each Legislature shall be furnished by the State
Librarian or his or her designee, at the commencement of the first session for
which they are elected, with one copy of each of the session laws and journals
of the preceding session, with a second copy furnished to any such member upon
such member's his or her request.
This section terminates on January 1, 2027.
Sec. 11. Section 49-509, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
49-509 Any remaining copies of the session laws and journals in the hands
of the State Librarian shall be sold by the Supreme Court at a price of fifteen
dollars for bound print copies of the session laws and forty dollars for bound
print copies of the journal, except that after two years have elapsed from the
date of publication, the court may sell any bound print copies of the session
laws and journals at a price of twenty-five cents per volume. Any remaining
copies of the session laws and journals in electronic format shall be sold by
the Supreme Court at a price not to exceed the amount necessary to recover the
cost of production, upon recommendation by the Clerk of the Legislature and
approval of the Executive Board of the Legislative Council.
The proceeds shall be remitted to the General Fund. When there is no
longer a demand for session laws and journals over two years old, the Supreme
Court may dispose of such session laws and journals in such manner as it deems
proper.
This section terminates on January 1, 2027.
Sec. 12. Section 49-509.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
49-509.01 The Clerk of the Legislature is hereby authorized and directed
to sell unbound print copies of the session laws and unbound print copies of
the daily journal of each legislative session at such price as shall be
prescribed by the Executive Board of the Legislative Council, which price shall
not exceed the amount necessary to recover costs. For the unbound print journal
and laws of a special session, when published separately from that of a regular
session, the price shall be as recommended by the Clerk of the Legislature and
approved by the Executive Board of the Legislative Council.
This section terminates on January 1, 2027.
Sec. 13. Section 49-617, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is amended to
read:
49-617 The Revisor of Statutes shall cause the statutes to be printed. The
printer shall deliver all completed copies to the Supreme Court. Such These
copies shall be held and disposed of by the court as follows: Sixty copies to
the State Library to exchange for statutes of other states; five copies to the
State Library to keep for daily use; not to exceed twenty-five copies to the
Legislative Council for bill drafting and related services to the Legislature
and executive state officers; as many copies to the Attorney General as there
are he or she has attorneys on the Attorney General's his or her staff; as many
copies to the Commission on Public Advocacy as it has attorneys on its staff;
up to sixteen copies to the State Court Administrator; thirteen copies to the
Tax Commissioner; eight copies to the Nebraska Publications Clearinghouse; six
copies to the Public Service Commission; four copies to the Secretary of State;
three copies to the Tax Equalization and Review Commission; four copies to the
Clerk of the Legislature for use in the clerk's his or her office and three
copies to be maintained in the legislative chamber, one copy on each side of
the chamber and one copy at the desk of the Clerk of the Legislature, under
control of the sergeant at arms; three copies to the Department of Health and
Human Services; two copies each to the Governor of the state, the Chief Justice
and each judge of the Supreme Court, each judge of the Court of Appeals, the
Clerk of the Supreme Court, the Reporter of Decisions, the Commissioner of
Labor, the Auditor of Public Accounts, and the Revisor of Statutes; one copy
each to the Secretary of State of the United States, each Indian tribal court
located in the State of Nebraska, the library of the Supreme Court of the
United States, the Adjutant General, the Air National Guard, the Commissioner
of Education, the State Treasurer, the Board of Educational Lands and Funds,
the Director of Agriculture, the Director of Administrative Services, the
-3-

LB1236 LB1236
2026 2026
Director of Economic Development, the director of the Nebraska Public Employees
Retirement Systems, the Director-State Engineer, the Director of Banking and
Finance, the Director of Insurance, the Director of Motor Vehicles, the
Director of Veterans' Affairs, the Director of Water, Energy, and Environment,
the Director of Correctional Services, the Nebraska Emergency Operating Center,
each judge of the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Court, each commissioner of
the Commission of Industrial Relations, the Nebraska Liquor Control Commission,
the State Real Estate Commission, the secretary of the Game and Parks
Commission, the Board of Pardons, each state institution under the Department
of Health and Human Services, each state institution under the State Department
of Education, the State Surveyor, the Nebraska State Patrol, the materiel
division of the Department of Administrative Services, the personnel division
of the Department of Administrative Services, the Nebraska Motor Vehicle
Industry Licensing Board, the Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges,
each of the Nebraska state colleges, each district judge of the State of
Nebraska, each judge of the county court, each judge of a separate juvenile
court, the Lieutenant Governor, each United States Senator from Nebraska, each
United States Representative from Nebraska, each clerk of the district court
for the use of the district court, the clerk of the Nebraska Workers'
Compensation Court, each clerk of the county court, each county attorney, each
county public defender, each county law library, and the inmate library at all
state penal and correctional institutions, and each member of the Legislature
shall be entitled to two complete sets, and two complete sets of such volumes
as are necessary to update previously issued volumes, but each member of the
Legislature and each judge of any court referred to in this section shall be
entitled, on request, to an additional complete set. Copies of the statutes
distributed without charge, as listed in this section, shall be the property of
the state or governmental subdivision of the state and not the personal
property of the particular person receiving a copy. Distribution of statutes to
the library of the College of Law of the University of Nebraska shall be as
provided in sections 85-176 and 85-177.
This section terminates on January 1, 2027.
Sec. 14. Section 49-704, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
49-704 (1) The Revisor of Statutes may, subject to the approval of the
Executive Board of the Legislative Council, negotiate and enter into a contract
without advertising for bids for the editing, printing, binding, and
publication, under the Revisor's his supervision and direction, of the
supplements and reissued or replacement volumes to the statutes of Nebraska.
(2) The Revisor of Statutes shall cause a sufficient number of copies of
such volumes to be printed under contract according to specifications to be
formulated by the Revisor of Statutes after taking into consideration the
requests made pursuant to the policy described in section 1 of this act.
Sec. 15. Section 49-707, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
49-707 The supplements and reissued or replacement volumes of the statutes
of Nebraska shall be sold and distributed by the Clerk of the Legislature
Supreme Court at such price as shall be prescribed by the Executive Board of
the Legislative Council pursuant to the policy described in section 1 of this
act, which price shall be sufficient to recover all costs of publication and
distribution.
The Supreme Court may sell for one dollar per volume any compilation or
revision of the statutes of Nebraska that has been superseded by a later
official revision, compilation, or replacement volume. The Supreme Court may
dispose of any unsold superseded volumes in any manner it deems proper.
All money received by the Clerk of the Legislature Supreme Court from the
sale of the supplements and reissued or replacement volumes shall be paid into
the state treasury to the credit of the Nebraska Statutes Cash Fund or the
Nebraska Statutes Distribution Cash Fund, as appropriate. That portion of the
money received that represents the costs of publication shall be credited to
the Nebraska Statutes Cash Fund, and that portion of the money received that
represents the costs of distribution shall be credited to the Nebraska Statutes
Distribution Cash Fund. The Clerk of the Legislature court shall take receipts
for all such money paid into the funds.
Supplements and reissued volumes shall be furnished and delivered free of
charge in the same number and to the same parties as are designated in section
49-617.
Sec. 16. Section 49-708, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
49-708 The Nebraska Statutes Cash Fund is created. The fund shall consist
of funds received pursuant to section 49-707. The fund shall be used by the
Revisor of Statutes to perform the duties required by subdivision (4) of
section 49-702 and section 49-704, except that transfers may be made from the
fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the
Nebraska Statutes Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by the
state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the
Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
The Nebraska Statutes Distribution Cash Fund is created. The fund shall
consist of funds received pursuant to section 49-707. The fund shall be used by
the Clerk of the Legislature Supreme Court to perform the duties required by
such section. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested
by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act
and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
-4-

LB1236 LB1236
2026 2026
Sec. 17. Section 49-1701, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
49-1701 (1) Following each statewide election at which an amendment to the
Constitution of Nebraska is adopted Except as provided in subsection (6) of
this section, following each regular session of the Legislature, the Revisor of
Statutes shall compile an updated copy of the Constitution of Nebraska, showing
all sections as they exist at that time and including notes after the end of
each section as follows:
(a) For each section, the Revisor of Statutes shall provide a note
referencing the source of such section and any amendments thereto;
(b) If a section is declared unconstitutional or inoperative, in whole or
in part, by the final judgment of a federal court or the Nebraska Supreme
Court, the Revisor of Statutes shall provide a note to that effect. The
Attorney General shall assist the Revisor of Statutes in complying with this
subdivision by promptly notifying the Revisor of Statutes when any section is
declared unconstitutional or inoperative; and
(c) For any section, the Revisor of Statutes may provide additional notes
at his or her discretion.
(2) Within ten calendar days after the board of state canvassers completes
the canvass of a statewide election at which an amendment to the Constitution
of Nebraska is adopted, the Revisor of Statutes shall The Revisor of Statutes
shall, within two days after the Legislature has adjourned sine die, transmit
the updated copy of the Constitution of Nebraska as compiled under subsection
(1) of this section to the Secretary of State for his or her review to
determine whether the updated copy accurately reflects the text of the
Constitution of Nebraska as it exists at that time. If the Secretary of State
determines that any changes are necessary, he or she shall, within five days
after receipt of the updated copy, notify the Revisor of Statutes of the
changes. The Revisor of Statutes shall make such changes and then promptly
return the updated copy to the Secretary of State for further review. If the
Secretary of State determines that no changes are necessary or that all
necessary changes have been made by the Revisor of Statutes, the Secretary of
State shall promptly certify the updated copy as an accurate reflection of the
text of the Constitution of Nebraska as it exists at that time and . The
Secretary of State shall then transmit the certified copy to the Clerk of the
Legislature for distribution no later than ten days after the Legislature has
adjourned sine die.
(3) After receiving the certified copy of the Constitution of Nebraska
from the Secretary of State pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the
Clerk of the Legislature shall:
(a) Make the certified copy available in electronic form on the
Legislature’s website;
(b) Include the certified copy in the session laws compiled and published
pursuant to section 49-501.01 or section 1 of this act; and
(c) Print pamphlets of the certified copy for distribution to the public
upon request.
(4) The certified copies printed by the Clerk of the Legislature pursuant
to subdivisions (3)(b) and (3)(c) of this section shall constitute the official
version of the Constitution of Nebraska and may be cited as prima facie
evidence of the law in all courts of this state.
(5) The Secretary of State shall maintain in his or her office a copy of
every edition of the Constitution of Nebraska certified pursuant to this
section.
(6) Following any other statewide general election regular session of the
Legislature, if the Revisor of Statutes determines that there have been no
changes to the text of the Constitution of Nebraska and no changes to the notes
required by subsection (1) of this section, the Revisor of Statutes may decide
not to compile an updated copy of the Constitution of Nebraska for that year.
If the Revisor of Statutes decides not to compile an updated copy for the year,
he or she shall notify the Secretary of State and the Clerk of the Legislature
of such fact and shall transmit the updated copy to the Secretary of State for
his or her review and certification under subsection (2) and the Clerk of the
Legislature shall continue to use the most recent year’s certified copy for
purposes of subsection (3) of this section.
Sec. 18. Section 83-901, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
83-901 The purpose of sections 49-617, 68-621, 72-249, 72-1302 to 72-1304,
81-101, 81-102, 81-1021, 83-101.08, 83-107.01, 83-108, 83-112, 83-135, 83-139,
83-140, 83-144, 83-145, 83-147 to 83-150, 83-153 to 83-156, 83-170 to 83-173,
83-186, 83-188, 83-443, and 83-901 to 83-916 is to establish an agency of state
government for the custody, study, care, discipline, training, and treatment of
persons in the correctional and detention institutions and for the study,
training, and treatment of persons under the supervision of other correctional
services of the state so that they may be prepared for lawful community living.
Correctional services shall be so diversified in program and personnel as to
facilitate individualization of treatment.
Sec. 19. Section 84-502, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
84-502 It shall be the duty of the Secretary of State:
(1) To countersign and affix the seal of the state to all commissions
required by law to be issued by the Governor;
(2) To keep a register of all such commissions specifying the person to
whom granted, the office conferred, the date of signing the commission, and,
-5-

LB1236 LB1236
2026 2026
when bond or an equivalent commercial insurance policy is taken, the date and
amount thereof and the names of the sureties;
(3) To make and keep proper indexes to the records and all public acts,
resolutions, papers, and documents in his or her office;
(4) To give any person requiring the same, and paying the lawful fees
therefor, a copy of any law, act, resolution, record, or paper in his or her
office, and attach thereto his or her certificate under the seal of the state;
and
(5) To distribute the laws and journals as authorized by section 49-501
and keep an account thereof; and
(5)(a) (6)(a) To act as the chief protocol officer of the State of
Nebraska;
(b) In coordination with the Governor, the Department of Economic
Development, the Department of Agriculture, and other interested federal,
state, and local officials, to actively seek appropriate contacts with other
officials in nations with which the state has or desires to have active trade,
cultural, or educational relations; and
(c) To help facilitate the interchange of ideas and contacts for
betterment of commerce, cultural exchange, or educational studies between such
nations and the state.
Sec. 20. Section 84-512, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
84-512 (1) The Secretary of State Cash Fund is created. The State
Treasurer shall transfer the balance of the Administration Cash Fund, the
Corporation Cash Fund, the Nebraska Collection Agency Fund, the Secretary of
State Administration Cash Fund, and the Uniform Commercial Code Cash Fund on
July 1, 2021, to the Secretary of State Cash Fund. The fund shall also include
fees and revenue collected by the Secretary of State pursuant to sections
13-2525, 21-186, 21-192, 21-205, 21-414, 21-1905, 21-2216, 21-2924, 25-3308,
33-101, 33-102, 45-606, 45-620, 45-806, 48-2609, 52-1004, 52-1312, 52-1313,
52-1316, 52-1602, 64-306, 64-313, 64-405, 64-415, 67-293, 67-462, 69-1204,
69-1206, 71-3204, 77-3903, 81-1921, 81-1922, 84-906.03, 87-130, 87-133, 87-134,
and 87-210 to 87-212 and sections 9-525 and 9-528, Uniform Commercial Code, and
any other fees and revenue designated for credit to the fund.
(2) The Secretary of State shall use the Secretary of State Cash Fund for
the administration of the office of the Secretary of State, including duties of
the Secretary of State relating to oaths and bonds under Chapter 11,
corporations and other business entities under Chapter 21, address
confidentiality under Chapter 42, collection agencies and credit service
organizations under Chapter 45, distribution of session laws and legislative
journals under Chapter 49, liens, including effective financing statements and
the master lien list, under Chapter 52, notaries public under Chapter 64,
partnerships under Chapter 67, debt management under Chapter 69, private
detectives under Chapter 71, truth and deception examiners under Chapter 81,
administrative duties, the Great Seal of the State of Nebraska, and rules and
regulations, under Chapter 84, trade names, trademarks, and service marks under
Chapter 87, and the Uniform Commercial Code, and any other administrative
duties as deemed necessary by the Secretary of State.
(3) Any money in the Secretary of State Cash Fund available for investment
shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska
Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 21. Section 84-1205.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
84-1205.02 Except as provided in sections 49-509, 52-1316 , and 60-483 and
article 9, Uniform Commercial Code, the board may establish reasonable fees for
electronic access to (1) public records or (2) electronic information and
services, through the portal. Fees for electronic access to public records
shall not exceed the statutory fee for copies of public records in other forms.
Any fees collected under this section shall be deposited in the Records
Management Cash Fund.
Sec. 22. Section 85-176, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
85-176 The following publications of the State of Nebraska shall, as they
are from time to time issued, be delivered by the respective officer having
custody thereof to the library of the College of Law of the University of
Nebraska:
(1) The opinions of the Nebraska Supreme Court and Court of Appeals in
either print or electronic format, or both, as determined by the Supreme Court;
(2) Five copies of the Opinions of the Attorney General, five copies of
the Blue Book, and two copies each of the reports and recommendations of the
Judicial Council and of the reports and recommendations of the Legislative
Council;
(3) Copies of the session laws and the journal of the Legislature as
provided in section 1 of this act 49-506;
(4) One copy each of the annual and biennial reports of the state officers
who are required by law to make an annual or biennial report; and
(5) Statutes issued by the Clerk of the Legislature Supreme Court shall be
requested requisitioned by the librarian of the College of Law pursuant to
section 1 of this act, allowing ten copies for the library of the College of
Law, five copies for the Legal Aid Bureau and the editors and staff of the
Nebraska Law Review, one copy each for every full-time member of the law
faculty, and no more than fifteen copies for the university libraries, nonlaw
faculty, and administrative officers of the university combined.
-6-

LB1236 LB1236
2026 2026
Sec. 23. Section 85-177, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
85-177 In order to enable the library of the College of Law to augment its
collections, the librarian of the College of Law of the University of Nebraska
is authorized to requisition from the respective officer having custody thereof
up to one hundred copies of the following state publications: Legislative
Journals, Session Laws, replacement volumes and supplements to the Revised
Statutes, and Opinions of the Attorney General. The copies of the Legislative
Journals, and Session Laws, and replacement volumes and supplements to the
Revised Statutes may be provided in print or electronic format as the Clerk of
the Legislature Secretary of State determines, upon recommendation by the Clerk
of the Legislature and approval of the Executive Board of the Legislative
Council.
Sec. 24. Sections 1, 14, 15, 16, 18, 19, 20, 21, 22, 23, and 26 of this
act become operative on January 1, 2027. Sections 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10,
11, 12, 13, and 25 of this act become operative three calendar months after the
adjournment of this legislative session. The other sections of this act become
operative on their effective date.
Sec. 25. Original sections 49-501, 49-501.01, 49-502, 49-503, 49-504,
49-505, 49-507, 49-508, 49-509, and 49-509.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and sections 49-506 and 49-617, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025,
are repealed.
Sec. 26. Original sections 49-704, 49-708, 83-901, 84-502, 84-512,
84-1205.02, 85-176, and 85-177, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and
section 49-707, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
Sec. 27. Original section 49-1701, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is repealed.
Sec. 28. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-7-